Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB189.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(17) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(17) Any multipurpose agricultural vehicle. Vehicles exempt from registration under this paragraph shall be used exclusively upon a farm or farms owned or operated by the owner of the vehicles or upon highways between:(i) Parts of one such farm.(ii) Such farms located not more than [five] ten miles apart.1234567891011121314151617 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0189PN0136 - 2 - 12